Washington statutes.
RCW 33.40.130

Payment of deposits accepted during economic emergency, preference.

Savings deposits received by an association, during a period or periods of postponement of payment of withdrawals or of acute business depression, panic or economic emergency under authorization or declaration of the director as hereinbefore provided, shall be repaid to the depositors paying in such savings before any liquidation dividends shall be declared or paid if, during such period or periods or at the expiration thereof, the director takes charge of the association for liquidation, as provided in this title.

[ 1994 c 92 s 464; 1982 c 3 s 73; 1945 c 235 s 100; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-219.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.